Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 31 Underground Utility Damage Prevention Act
65-31-112. Civil penalties and remedies — Liability — Indemnification — Offense of Vandalism.

Any person who violates this chapter, or the rules promulgated under this chapter, shall be subject to a civil penalty as follows:

For a first violation, the violator shall complete a course of training concerning compliance with this chapter as determined by the executive committee;

For a second or subsequent violation, the violator shall complete a course of training concerning compliance with this chapter as determined by the executive committee or pay a civil penalty in an amount set by the executive committee, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per incident, or both; and

Notwithstanding subdivisions (e)(1) and (2), if any violation was the result of gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct as determined by the executive committee, the executive committee shall require the violator to complete a course of training concerning compliance with this chapter as determined by the executive committee and pay a civil penalty in an amount set by the executive committee, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) per incident.

For the purposes of this chapter, monetary civil penalties shall not be levied against any department of this state. In the event that a state department is found by the executive committee to be noncompliant, the executive committee may submit a notice of noncompliance to the department head along with a request for an action plan for future compliance.

For the purposes of this chapter, monetary civil penalties shall not be levied against a county, city, town, utility district, or other political subdivision of this state unless the executive committee finds that the county, city, town, utility district, or other political subdivision of this state has engaged in a pattern of willful noncompliance with the requirements of this chapter.

Except as provided in subsection (e), this section shall not limit any person's right to pursue any additional civil remedy otherwise allowed by law.

Any person who is required to complete a course of training under subsection (a) shall be responsible for paying for the cost of the training.

Any excavator who violates this chapter may be issued a notice of violation by the inspector, and the inspector may require any excavator to cease work on any excavation, or not start a proposed excavation, until the excavator complies with this chapter.

An excavator who complies with this chapter shall not be liable for damage that the excavator causes to an operator's underground facility, if:

The operator received the notification required by § 65-31-106;

The operator fails to locate its underground facilities as required by § 65-31-108; and

The damage is a proximate result of the operator's failure to locate its underground facilities as required by § 65-31-108.

Any person who violates § 65-31-106 and whose subsequent excavation or blasting damages utility facilities or sewer laterals shall also indemnify the affected facility owner or operator and the one-call service against all claims or costs incurred, if any, for personal injury, property damage, or service interruptions resulting from damaging the utility facilities or sewer laterals.

The requirements of subdivision (e)(3)(A) shall not apply to any state agency, county, city, town, utility district, or other political subdivision of this state.

Any person who knowingly and willfully removes or otherwise destroys the stakes or other physical markings used to mark the horizontal route of an underground facility commits the offense of vandalism under § 39-14-408, and shall be subject to the punishment for vandalism under § 39-14-105.

Acts 1978, ch. 692, § 12; T.C.A., § 65-3212; Acts 1985, ch. 69, § 1; 1999, ch. 73, § 6; 2006, ch. 686, § 11; 2015, ch. 488, § 6.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “(a) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter commits a Class A misdemeanor, and is subject to a fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or a term of imprisonment not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours, or both.“(b)(1) Any excavator who violates the provisions of this chapter may be issued a citation by any local or state law enforcement officer or permitting agency inspector, and the issuer of a citation may require any excavator to cease work on any excavation or not start a proposed excavation until there has been compliance with the provisions of this chapter.“(2) If, after receiving proper notification as required in § 65-31-106, an operator fails to locate its facilities as required in § 65-31-108, an underground facility of such operator is damaged by an excavator who has complied with the provisions of this chapter; and such damage is a proximate result of the operator's failure to discharge such duty, then such excavator shall not be liable for such damage.“(c)(1) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter may be required to appear before the appropriate court as set forth in § 40-1-107. Any person who fails to appear or otherwise properly respond to a citation issued pursuant to this section shall, in addition to the penalties as set forth in the citation, be charged with a misdemeanor offense and, upon conviction, commits a Class B misdemeanor, punishable as provided in § 40-35-111.“(2) Any person cited for a violation of this chapter, unless required to appear before the appropriate court may:“(A) Post a bond, which shall be equal in the amount to the applicable penalty; or“(B) Sign and accept a citation promising to appear before the appropriate court.“(3) The issuing officer shall indicate on the citation the time and location of the scheduled hearing and shall indicate the applicable penalty.“(4) Any person charged with a violation of this chapter, unless required to appear before the appropriate court, may:“(A) Pay the penalty, in lieu of appearance, either by mail or in person, within ten (10) days after the date of receiving the citation; or“(B) Forfeit the bond, if a bond is posted, by not appearing at the designated time and location.“(5) If the person cited follows either of the procedures of subdivisions (c)(4)(A) or (B), such person shall be deemed to have admitted to committing the infraction and to have waived the right to a hearing on the issue of commission of the infraction. Such admission may be used as evidence in any other proceeding.“(d) Any person who knowingly and willfully removes or otherwise destroys the stakes or other physical markings used to mark the horizontal route of an underground facility commits the offense of vandalism as set forth in § 39-14-408, and shall be subject to the punishment for vandalism as set forth in § 39-14-105.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

Collateral References.

Applicability of rule of strict liability to injury from electrical current escaping from powerline. 82 A.L.R.3d 218, 60 A.L.R.4th 732.

Liability of electric company to one other than employee for injury or death arising from commencement or resumption of service. 46 A.L.R.5th 423.

Liability of gas company for damage resulting from failure to inspect or supervise work of contractors digging near gas pipes. 71 A.L.R.3d 1174.

65-31-113. Severability.

If any provisions of this chapter or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

Acts 1993, ch. 223, § 20.

65-31-114. Underground utility damage enforcement board — Executive committee.

There is created within the Tennessee public utility commission, created by § 65-1-101, an underground utility damage enforcement board for the purpose of enforcing this chapter.

The Tennessee public utility commission will provide administrative and investigative support for the board, both subject to concurrence by the board. Pursuant to § 65-2-122, the Tennessee public utility commission shall charge the expenses associated with the administration and investigative duties of the board back to the board, subject to concurrence by the board.

The board shall be composed of seventeen (17) members. Except for initial appointments, members who are not ex officio members shall be appointed to four-year terms. Appointments to the board shall be made as follows:

The president of Tennessee One-Call, Inc., or the president's designee, who shall be a voting, ex officio member;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of Tennessee natural gas distribution systems, to be appointed by the governor, whose initial term shall be four (4) years. In considering appointees, the governor shall review a list of qualified persons submitted by the Tennessee Gas Association;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of Tennessee utility districts, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate, whose initial term shall be four (4) years. In considering appointees, the speaker shall review a list of qualified persons submitted by the Tennessee Association of Utility Districts;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of the Tennessee cable industry, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, whose initial term shall be four (4) years. In considering appointees, the speaker shall review a list of qualified persons submitted by the Tennessee Cable and Telecommunications Association;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of large Tennessee incumbent local exchange carriers with more than one hundred thousand (100,000) customers, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, whose initial term shall be four (4) years;

One (1) member shall be a person who represents the interests of public utilities, as defined in § 65-4-101, and who provides water or wastewater services, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate, whose initial term shall be four (4) years;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of Tennessee towns and cities, to be appointed by the governor whose initial term shall be three (3) years. In considering appointees, the governor shall review a list of qualified persons submitted by the Tennessee Municipal League;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of small Tennessee incumbent local exchange carriers, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate, whose initial term shall be three (3) years. In considering appointees, the speaker shall review a list of qualified persons submitted by the Tennessee Telecommunications Association;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of Tennessee counties, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, whose initial term shall be three (3) years. In considering appointees, the speaker shall review a list of qualified persons submitted by the Tennessee County Services Association;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of Tennessee road builders, to be appointed by the governor, whose initial term shall be three (3) years. In considering appointees, the governor shall review a list of qualified persons submitted by the Tennessee Road Builders Association;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of the excavation industry, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate, whose initial term shall be two (2) years. In considering appointees, the speaker shall review a list of qualified persons submitted by the Associated Builders and Contractors of Tennessee;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of interstate pipelines, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, whose initial term shall be two (2) years;

One (1) member shall be a private property owner representing agricultural or homeowners' interests, to be appointed by the governor, whose initial term shall be two (2) years;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of municipal electric utilities with underground facilities, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate, whose initial term shall be two (2) years. In considering appointees, the speaker shall review a list of qualified persons submitted by the Tennessee Municipal Electric Power Association;

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of cooperative electric systems with underground facilities, to be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives, whose initial term shall be two (2) years. In considering appointees, the speaker shall review a list of qualified persons submitted by the Tennessee Electric Cooperative Association;

One (1) member shall be a person who represents the interests of public utilities, as defined in § 65-4-101, and who provides electric power services, to be appointed by the governor, whose initial term shall be four (4) years; and

One (1) member shall be a person representing the interests of contract locators, to be appointed by the speaker of the senate, whose initial term shall be four (4) years.

Every two (2) years, the board shall elect a chair from among its members and other officers as the board deems necessary.

The members of the board shall serve without compensation.

The board shall elect an executive committee, which shall be responsible for levying civil penalties and taking action as described in § 65-31-116.

The executive committee shall be composed of the following members of the board:

One (1) member from subdivision (c)(10), (c)(11), or (c)(13);

One (1) member from a local government; and

One (1) member from a utility.

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(3)(B), a member serving on the executive committee shall be limited to two (2) consecutive one-year terms.

In order to stagger the terms of the members serving on the executive committee, the members serving on the executive committee as of April 12, 2018, shall be appointed as follows:

The person appointed under subdivision (f)(2)(A) shall serve a term of one (1) year, which shall expire on June 30, 2019;

The person appointed under subdivision (f)(2)(B) shall serve a term of two (2) years, which shall expire on June 30, 2020; and

The person appointed under subdivision (f)(2)(C) shall serve a term of three (3) years, which shall expire on June 30, 2021.

Following the expiration of members' terms as prescribed in subdivision (f)(3)(B), a member serving on the executive committee shall be limited to two (2) consecutive one-year terms.

The board and the executive committee may hold meetings and vote by telephone, television, or other electronic means.

Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 7; 2017, ch. 94, § 64; 2018, ch. 716, §§ 7, 8.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-31-114 (Acts 2013, ch. 65, §§ 1, 2), concerning the underground utility damage prevention advisory committee, was deemed obsolete and was deleted by the code commission in 2015.

The underground utility damage enforcement board created by this section terminates June 30, 2023. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-244.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (a) and (b).

The 2018 amendment substituted “seventeen (17) members” for “sixteen (16) members” in the introductory paragraph of (c); added (c)(17); and, in (f)(3), added “Except as provided in subdivision (f)(3)(B),” at the beginning of (A), and added (B) and (C).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 716, § 11. April 12, 2018.

65-31-115. Powers and duties of board.

The board has the power and authority to:

Promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the conduct of the affairs of the board;

Adopt a seal for the board, prescribe the style of the seal, and alter the seal at the board's pleasure; and

Make and enter into contracts.

The board shall:

Through its executive committee, initiate investigations and conduct hearings as required by § 65-31-116;

Meet a minimum of two (2) times per calendar year;

Examine data regarding underground utility damage and make recommendations to the general assembly for further updates to this chapter;

Manage the underground damage prevention fund created by § 65-31-117;

Assess its annual operating cost to operators in an amount equal to the amount necessary to offset the cost of investigative and administrative services performed by the Tennessee public utility commission at the direction of the board. The annual operating costs shall be apportioned in a proportional manner and collected by the one-call service from the operators; and

Subject to the availability of funding in the underground damage prevention fund created by § 65-31-117, contract with appropriate entities or agencies to conduct training and public awareness for damage prevention.

Any member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year shall be removed as a member of the board.

The board's chair shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (c)(1).

The executive committee shall review the reasonableness of fees and any subsequent changes to the fees charged to violators by the board's designated provider of compliance training ordered pursuant to § 65-31-112.

Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 8; 2017, ch. 94, § 65; 2017, ch. 117, § 3; 2018, ch. 716, § 4.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment by ch. 94 substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (b)(5).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 117 added (c).

The 2018 amendment added (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2017, ch. 117, § 4. April 12, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 716, § 11. April 12, 2018.

Attorney General Opinions. The members of the Underground Utility Damage Enforcement Board may receive reimbursement for travel expenses or per diem for travel and incidental expenses incurred in attending Board and executive committee meetings. The Board may include in its “annual operating cost” expense reimbursements and per diem allowances. It must adhere to the quorum requirements of T.C.A. § 8-44-108(b)(1) but may, under appropriate circumstances, invoke the “necessity” provisions, which allow for a quorum by electronic or other means when there is a demonstrable necessity. OAG 16-25, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 25 (7/15/2016).

65-31-116. Investigation of complaint of violation of chapter — Issuance of citations — Hearing — Appeal — Petition for review.

Upon receipt of a complaint of a violation of this chapter, the executive committee shall initiate an investigation of the complaint by requesting that the Tennessee public utility commission designate an employee of the commission who will investigate the complaint at the executive committee's direction.

Any investigator acting at the direction of the executive committee may issue citations for violations of this chapter. Any citation may include a recommendation for the penalty to be assessed under § 65-31-112.

If the person to whom the citation is issued under subsection (b) does not pay the citation or submit to ordered training, or both, within thirty (30) days, then the executive committee shall appoint a hearing officer to conduct a hearing and issue an initial order pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The hearing shall be held in the Nashville, Davidson County, offices of the Tennessee public utility commission at the time set forth in the citation notice of hearing.

An appeal of the initial order pursuant to § 4-5-315 shall be heard by the executive committee.

A person aggrieved by the final order may, within sixty (60) days, file a petition for judicial review pursuant to § 4-5-322. In the case of a decision involving an excavation in proximity to underground facilities of a municipally-owned utility located in a county having a population of greater than three hundred thousand (300,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the petition for review shall be filed in the chancery court located in that county. In all other cases, the petition for review shall be filed in the chancery court of Davidson County.

Nothing in this chapter shall grant the executive committee or the board jurisdiction over damage to utilities located above ground.

Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 8; 2017, ch. 94, § 66; 2018, ch. 716, § 9.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment in (a), substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” and substituted “commission” for “authority”.

The 2018 amendment, in (c), deleted the former last sentence which read: “The hearing shall be conducted in the county where the excavation referenced in the citation occurred, unless otherwise agreed to by the person to whom the citation is issued. In the event the excavation occurred in more than one (1) county, then the hearing shall be conducted in the county where the greatest amount of excavation referenced in the citation occurred.”, and substituted “shall be held in the Nashville, Davidson County, offices of the Tennessee public utility commission at the time set forth” for “shall be held at the time and place set forth” in the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 716, § 11. April 12, 2018.

65-31-117. Underground damage prevention fund.

There is created an underground damage prevention fund within the Tennessee public utility commission. All civil penalties collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited into the underground damage prevention fund. Any moneys remaining in the underground damage prevention fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall remain in the underground damage prevention fund for the exclusive use of the board.

The expenditure of moneys in the underground damage prevention fund shall be at the discretion of the board for the following purposes:

Providing grants to operators with fewer than five thousand (5,000) customers to assist the recipient in complying with the mandatory notification center requirements of this chapter. However, grants shall not be used for operating expenses, and no grants shall be given for this purpose after January 1, 2018; and

Contracting with providers of public awareness, educational, and compliance training.

Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 8; 2017, ch. 94, § 79.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-31-118. Design locate request.

Any person may submit a design locate request to the one-call service. The design locate request shall:

Describe the tract or parcel of land for which the design locate request has been submitted with sufficient particularity, as defined by policies developed by the one-call service, to enable the facility owner or operator to ascertain the precise tract or parcel of land involved; and

State the name, address, and telephone number of the person who has submitted the design locate request, as well as the name, address, and telephone number of any other person authorized to review any records subject to inspection under subdivision (b)(1)(C).

Within fifteen (15) working days after a design locate request has been submitted to the one-call service for a proposed project, the facility owner or operator shall respond by one (1) of the following methods:

Designate or cause to be designated by a locator under § 65-31-108, the location of all utility facilities and sewer laterals within the area of the proposed excavation;

Provide to the person submitting the design locate request the best available description of all utility facilities and sewer laterals in the area of proposed excavation, which might include drawings of utility facilities and sewer laterals already built in the area, or other facility records that are maintained by the facility owner or operator; or

Allow the person submitting the design locate request or any other authorized person to inspect or copy the drawings or other records for all utility facilities and sewer laterals within the proposed area of excavation.

In the event that the one-call service charges a fee to a member operator for design location notification, the utility operator may recover that fee from the requestor.

Upon responding pursuant to subsection (b), the facility owner or operator shall provide the response to the one-call service in accordance with one-call service procedures.

An operator may reject a design locate request based upon homeland security considerations pending the operator obtaining additional information confirming the legitimacy of the request. The operator shall notify the person making the request of the denial and may request additional information through the positive response system provided by the one-call service.

Nothing in this section shall supersede any federal, state, or local laws governing the confidentiality of the location of utility facilities.

Any utility operator responding to a design locate request under this section shall not be liable for any damages associated with the response to the request.

Nothing in this chapter shall amend, alter, or affect title 54, chapter 5, part 8.

A design locate request shall not be used for excavation purposes.

Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 8.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

65-31-119. Administrative and investigative support of Tennessee public utility commission limited to advisory capacity.

The administrative and investigative support provided by the Tennessee public utility commission is provided to the board in an advisory capacity only, and nothing in this chapter shall expand the jurisdiction of the Tennessee public utility commission in any way.

Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 8; 2017, ch. 94, § 67.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.

Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-31-120. Clarification of liability, obligations and reporting requirements related to excavation activities.

Engaging in the activities described in the definition of “excavate” or “excavation” in § 65-31-102(8)(B) shall not remove or impose liability per se for damage to underground utilities.

Nothing in the definition of “excavate” or “excavation” in § 65-31-102 shall remove the obligation of any excavator, whether engaged in excavation or in activities described in § 65-31-102(8)(B), from the reporting requirements of § 65-31-111.

Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 8.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 488, § 10. May 20, 2015.